Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1348YH (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 103 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Student parents at 1 institutions. 2 1. For the purposes of this section: 3 a. âInstitutionâ means an institution of higher education 4 governed by the state board of regents or a community college 5 established under chapter 260C. âInstitutionâ also includes 6 the faculty, staff, and other employees of such institution of 7 higher education or community college established under chapter 8 260C. 9 b. âReasonable accommodationsâ includes but is not limited 10 to all of the following: 11 (1) Taking additional health and safety measures. 12 (2) Allowing a student to reschedule tests and assignment 13 due dates that are missed for reasons related to the studentâs 14 pregnancy. 15 (3) Allowing a student to take a leave of absence. 16 (4) Excusing absences for reasons deemed medically 17 necessary due to the pregnancy. 18 2. An institution shall not require a student enrolled 19 in a course of study or research activity to take a leave 20 of absence, withdraw from a program, or limit the studentâs 21 participation in academic activities solely due to pregnancy. 22 An institution shall make reasonable accommodations to a 23 pregnant student to allow the student to complete a course of 24 study or research. 25 3. a. An institution shall allow a student who is pregnant 26 or has recently given birth an additional amount of time to 27 take examinations up to the longer of a period consistent with 28 the policies of the institution or twelve months from the 29 originally scheduled examination date, unless a longer period 30 is medically necessary. 31 b. An institution shall allow a student who is pregnant 32 or has recently given birth an additional amount of time to 33 complete a degree or candidacy for a degree up to the longer 34 of a period consistent with the policies of the institution 35 -1- LSB 1348YH (2) 91 je/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 103 or twelve months from the date originally scheduled for 1 completion, unless a longer period is medically necessary. 2 4. a. An institution shall allow a student who is pregnant 3 or has recently given birth a period of up to twelve months to 4 take a leave of absence unless there is a medically necessary 5 reason for a longer leave of absence. Following the leave 6 of absence, the student shall be allowed to return to the 7 studentâs program with the same standing as the student left to 8 the degree reasonably possible. 9 b. If a student who is residing in student housing through 10 the institution elects to take a leave of absence pursuant to 11 paragraph âaâ , the institution shall allow the student to reside 12 in student housing during the studentâs leave of absence. 13 5. a. The attorney general shall maintain a system to 14 receive and investigate complaints from students alleging a 15 violation of this section. 16 b. The attorney general shall forward complaints it 17 has determined as founded to the United States department 18 of educationâs office for civil rights to allow for an 19 investigation into the institutionâs compliance with the 20 federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. 21 Â§1681 et seq. 22 6. An institution shall do all of the following: 23 a. Maintain a written policy for students on pregnancy 24 discrimination and procedures for addressing pregnancy 25 discrimination complaints under this section and the federal 26 Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. Â§1681 et 27 seq. The institution shall provide a copy of the policy to 28 institution faculty, staff, and employees in required training. 29 The institution shall provide a copy of the policy to all 30 students attending orientation at the institution. 31 b. Prominently post notice of the protections afforded to 32 pregnant students and students who have recently given birth 33 under the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 34 U.S.C. Â§1681 et seq., on the institutionâs internet site. 35 -2- LSB 1348YH (2) 91 je/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 103 c. Provide information concerning the protections afforded 1 to pregnant students and students who have recently given birth 2 under the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 3 U.S.C. Â§1681 et seq., through the institutionâs medical center 4 and student health center to a student upon the studentâs 5 request and when otherwise appropriate. 6 d. Assign responsibility for pregnancy and parenting support 7 and protection to a staff member of the institution. The 8 institution shall post the responsible staff memberâs name, 9 title, and contact information on the institutionâs internet 10 site. Responsibilities assigned to a staff member pursuant to 11 this paragraph shall include but not be limited to: 12 (1) Maintaining current knowledge of the provisions of this 13 section. 14 (2) Overseeing institution compliance with this section. 15 (3) Understanding and publicizing topics related to 16 pregnancy and parenting, including but not limited to child 17 care availability, breastfeeding accommodations, and pregnancy 18 and parenting assistance from public and private providers, in 19 order to enhance campus life and academic performance. 20